Hawaii statutes.
[§240-1.5] Surcharge amounts exempt.
Amounts received in the form of a monthly surcharge by a utility acting on
behalf of an affected utility under section 269-16.3 shall not be gross
receipts for the acting utility for purposes of this chapter. Any amounts
retained by the acting utility for collection or other costs shall not be
included in this exemption. [L 1993, c 337, §3]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next